California, session 20252026, AB1773.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1385.007 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:1385.007. (a) The department shall maintain a public internet website displaying the following information for each licensed pharmacy benefit manager:(1) Legal name.(2) License number and status.(3) Initial licensure date.(4) License expiration date.(b) This section shall be implemented utilizing existing resources of the department. If the department determines that additional resources are required for implementation, this section shall become operative only upon appropriation of sufficient funds for this purpose in the annual Budget Act or another measure providing the funding.SECTION 1.Section 14184.800 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:14184.800.(a)Notwithstanding any other law, commencing no sooner than January 1, 2023, a qualifying inmate of a public institution shall be eligible to receive targeted Medi-Cal services for 90 days, or the number of days approved in the CalAIM Terms and Conditions with respect to an eligible population of qualifying inmates if different than 90 days, before the date they are released from a public institution, if otherwise eligible for those services under this chapter and subject to subdivision (f) of Section 14184.102.(b)Targeted Medi-Cal services made available to qualifying inmates pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be limited to those services approved in the CalAIM Terms and Conditions.(c)To the extent federal approval is obtained to implement this section, the department shall arrange for an independent, third-party evaluation of the hypotheses and outcomes associated with providing targeted Medi-Cal services to qualifying inmates as described in the CalAIM Terms and Conditions. The department shall post the evaluation report on its internet website following submission to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.